th: ประเภทไทล์เกม: โดมิโน; ไพ่นกกระจอก; เกมจับคู่; เกมต่อแผ่นกระดาน; เกมสร้างคำ; อื่นๆ
nb: Feltspilltype: Domino; Mahjong; Matchingspill; Brikkeplassering; Ordbygging; Annet
lt-LT: Žaidimo kaladėlėmis tipas: Domino; Mahjong; Derinimo žaidimas; Plytelių dėliojimas; Žodžių dėlionė; Kita
ru: Тип игры с костями: Домино; Маджонг; Игра на совпадение; Размещение плитки; Слова; Другой
hr-HR: Vrsta igre s pločicama: Domino; Mahjong; Povezivanje; Postavljanje pločica; Sastavljanje riječi; Ostalo
ja: タイルゲームタイプ: ドミノ; 麻雀; マッチングゲーム; タイル配置; 単語構築; その他
el: Τύπος παιχνιδιού πλακιδίων: Ντόμινο; Mahjong; Παιχνίδι ταιριάσματος; Τοποθέτηση πλακιδίων; Δόμηση λέξεων; Άλλο
cs: Typ dlaždicové hry: Domino; Mahjong; Paměťová hra; Přikládání dílků; Stavba slov; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip de joc cu piese plate: Domino; Mahjong; Joc de potrivire; Poziționarea pieselor; Construirea de cuvinte; Altele
es: Tipo de juego de fichas: Dominó; Mahjong; Juego de parejas; Colocación de fichas; Construcción de palabras; Otros
de: Art des Legespiels: Domino; Mahjong; Matching-Spiel; Kachelplatzierung; Wortbildung; Sonstiges
en: Tile game type: Dominoes; Mahjong; Matching game; Tile placement; Word building; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de jogo de peças: Dominó; Mahjong; Jogo de correspondência; Assentamento de ladrilhos; Construção de palavras; Outro
zh-TW: 圖塊遊戲類型: 骨牌; 麻將; 配對遊戲; 板塊放置; 組字玩具; 其他
fi: Laattapelin tyyppi: Domino; Mahjong; Muistipelit; Laattapelit; Sanarakennussarjat; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta igre s ploščicami: Domine; Mahjong; Igra ujemanja; Postavitev ploščic; Gradnja besed; Drugo
hu: Kockajáték típusa: Dominó; Mahjong; Párosító játék; Csempeelhelyezés; Szóépítés; Egyéb
vi: Loại trò chơi xếp gạch: Domino; Mạt chược; Trò chơi ghép hình; Trò chơi xếp gạch; Ghép từ; Khác
sv: Typ av brickspel: Domino; Mahjong; Matchningsspel; Placering av kakelplattor; Ordbyggnad; Övrigt
tr: Fayans oyun türü: Domino; Mahjong; Eşleştirme Oyunları; Fayans yerleştirme; Kelime Kurma; Diğer
zh-CN: 骨牌游戏类型: 骨牌; 麻将; 配对游戏; 拼图游戏; 构词游戏; 其他
bg-BG: Тип игра с плочки: Домино; Маджонг; Игра за съвпадение; Позициониране на ключалка; Изграждане на думи; Други
fr: Type de jeu de tuiles: Dominos; Mahjong; Jeux d’association; Jeux de placement de tuiles; Construction de mots; Autre
it: Tipo di gioco a tessere: Domino; Mahjong; Gioco di abbinamento; Posizionamento delle piastrelle; Costruzione di parole; Altro
nl: Type tegelspel: Domino; Mahjong; Matchpuzzel; Tegel plaatsing; Woord bouwen; Andere
da: Type af brikspil: Domino; Mahjong; Vendespil; Klinkeplacering; Ordbygning; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de jogo de peças: Dominó; Mahjong; Jogo de memória; Colocação de peças; Criação de palavras; Outro
ko: 타일 게임 타입: 도미노; 마작; 짝맞추기 게임; 타일 놓기; 단어 만들기; 기타
sk-SK: Typ hry s kameňmi: Domino; Madžong; Pexeso; Prikladanie kartičiek; Tvorenie slov; Iné
pl: Rodzaj gry z żetonami: Domino; Mahjong; Gra w dopasowywanie; Gra w układanie kafelków; Budowanie wyrazów; Inne